Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission shall conduct a study
of the condition of Oregon’s  post-secondary education system and develop detailed recom-
Enrolled House Bill 4124 (HB 4124-B) Page 1
mendations for the design, implementation and  operation of a viable and superior institu-
tional framework that:
(a) Supports access to post-secondary education  institutions for students across ge-
ographic location, including rural communities and other underserved populations;
(b) Fuels regional and statewide  economic development and employment opportunities;
and
(c) Improves the financial  viability of each post-secondary education institution in
Oregon and the post-secondary  education system as a whole, including by addressing
projected enrollment,  increased personnel costs, changes in federal law or priorities, sector-
specific inflationary costs or other related factors.
(2) The study must evaluate  and make recommendations on each of the following sub-
jects:
(a) The distinct objectives and missions of each category of  post-secondary education
institution, including community college, public university, regional university and research
university, in consideration of key variables such as research,  public services, instruction,
academic programming, educational model and the student population served; and
(b) Opportunities for  collaboration, restructuring or integration in the post-secondary
education system.
(3) The study may  evaluate and make recommendations on each of the following subjects:
(a) Development  of academic programs and specialties to support current and emerging
regional and state economic development and workforce needs;
(b) Criteria for the review of  unnecessary program duplication across post-secondary
education institutions and unmet program needs statewide;
(c) Structures and supports to  connect students and graduates to employers and em-
ployment opportunities;
(d) Funding strategies, including strategies to foster  collaboration, restructuring or in-
tegration in the post-secondary education system; and
(e) Metrics of affordability for students and financial health for post-secondary  education
institutions.
(4) In developing recommendations under this section,  the commission shall engage the
expertise of and consult  public institutions of higher education, including faculty, staff and
students, and any other interested stakeholders identified by the commission.
(5) The commission shall submit a preliminary and final report on  the results of the
study, in the manner provided under  ORS 192.245, along with any recommended legislative
changes, to the interim or regular committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to higher
education no later than:
(a) October 1, 2026, for the preliminary report.
(b) April 1, 2027, for the final report.
(6) The commission may utilize third-party contractors to  carry out all or part of this
section.
SECTION 2.
This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4124 (HB 4124-B) Page 2
Passed by House February 27, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4124 (HB 4124-B) Page 3